Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1509
Commission; additional contracts
authorized; matching grants.

The commission, at its own discretion, may enter into contracts
with other entities for purposes of executing or expanding the program. The
commission may include the offer of matching grants to pay for deer processing
to entities that acquire funding from sources other than the state to pay
for expenses of the program.

Laws 2012, LB928, § 13.